North Dakota, session 69, HB1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-25-40.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
4.1-25-40.1. Sale of raw milk or raw milk products directly to a consumer - Prohibitions -
Exemptions.
1. A farm may sell raw milk or raw milk products directly to the end consumer in this state for
personal consumption.
2. A farm may not sell raw milk or raw milk products to a wholesaler or retail store for mass
consumption under this chapter. The seller shall onlymay not sell raw milk withinor raw milk
products outside this state. The sale may not involve interstate commerce. Raw milk or raw
milk products may not be donated.
3. A farm selling raw milk or raw milk products under the provisions of this section is not subject
to any other provision of this chapter, chapters 4.1-05, 4.1-26, 19-02.1, or 23-9, or title 64.
4. A farm selling raw milk or raw milk products shall label the products as "raw milk" or "made
with raw milk".

H. B. NO. 1131 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1131.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 5 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State